Illinois, session 104th, SB1257.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Toll Highway Act is amended by adding 5Section 19.2 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 10/19.2 new)7    Sec. 19.2. Option to pay with tangible legal United States 8currency. By no later than one year after the effective date of 9this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 10Authority shall establish an option to pay with tangible legal 11United States currency at every toll plaza and toll location 12point. In this Section, "tangible legal United States 13currency" means coins minted or federal reserve notes printed 14by or under the authority of the United States Department of 15the Treasury that are legal tender in the United States of 16America.